Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 111. new text end new text begin Officer / Firefighter Gary L. Schroeder, Jr. Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin That segment of marked Trunk Highway 58 within the city of Zumbrota is designated as "Officer / Firefighter Gary L. Schroeder, Jr. Memorial Highway." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. new text end